District of Columbia statutes.
26-1019

Licensee liability.

The liability of a licensee to any person for a money transmission conducted by the licensee, or an authorized delegate of the licensee, on behalf of the person shall be limited to the amount of money transmitted or the face amount of the payment instrument purchased.

July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-140, § 20, 47 DCR 3431